src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_IE_SG_OBL

N_IE_SG_OBL_Px ;

                         +Acc:ie%>m          FINAL1 ;
                  +Gen:ie%>n          FINAL1 ;
              +Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan     FINAL1 ;
                  +Ine:e%>sne         FINAL1 ;
                  +Ela:e%>ste         FINAL1 ;
                  +Com:%>ine          FINAL1 ;
       +Com+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine    FINAL1 ;


LEXICON N_IE_PL
               +Nom:ie%>h            FINAL1 ;
      +Nom+Err/Orth:i%>h            FINAL1 ;
         +Acc+NoUml:%>ide            FINAL1 ;
    +Acc+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide      FINAL1 ;
         +Gen+NoUml:ie%>j            FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+NoUml+Err/Orth:i%>j            FINAL1 ;
    +Gen+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLi        FINAL1 ;
         +Ill+NoUml:%>ide            FINAL1 ;
    +Ill+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide      FINAL1 ;
         +Ine+NoUml:%>ine            FINAL1 ;
    +Ine+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine      FINAL1 ;
         +Ela+NoUml:%>ijste          FINAL1 ;
    +Ela+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLijste    FINAL1 ;
         +Com+NoUml:ie%>jgujmie      FINAL1 ;
 +Com+NoUml+Err/Orth:i%>jgujmie      FINAL1 ;
   +Com+Uml+Err/Orth:%>%^iUMLigyjmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+NoUml+Err/Orth:ie%>jgyjmie     FINAL1 ;
    +Com+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLigujmie  FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_IE_ESS
      +Ess+NoUml:%>ine       FINAL1 ;
 +Ess+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine FINAL1 ;


!LEXICON N_IE_COMP ! a reference from the Adj.affix-file
!N_IE ;
!        :ie EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON TJULHPIE ! adverb
         :tjulhp     N_IE    ;
         :tjulhpiehk ODDCOMP ;


! LEXICON TJIDTJIE
!          +Der1+Der/Rec+N:ie           LAAHKOEH_EVEN ;
!                      +Sg:             N_IE_SG       ;
!                      +Pl:             N_IE_PL       ;
!                                       N_IE_ESS      ;
!                +Cmp/SgNom:ie           R             ;
!                +Cmp/SgGen:ie%>n        R             ;
!                +Cmp/PlGen:ie%>j        R             ;
!            +Cmp/PlGen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi    R             ;
!        +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj GÅATETJE      ;
!    +Der1+Der/ijes+A+Attr:%»%^1UMLijes ATTR_0        ;
!  +Der1+Der/ijes+A+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLijes FINAL1        ;
!           +Der1+Der/ijes+A:%»%^1UMLij   ODDCOMP       ;

!LEXICON TJÅENIEH !ie plural lexicon
!               +Pl+Nom:ie%>h           FINAL1    ;
!         +Pl+Acc+NoUml:%>ide           FINAL1    ;
!    +Pl+Acc+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide     FINAL1    ;
!         +Pl+Gen+NoUml:ie%>j           FINAL1    ;
!    +Pl+Gen+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLi       FINAL1    ;
!         +Pl+Ill+NoUml:%>ide           FINAL1    ;
!    +Pl+Ill+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLide     FINAL1    ;
!         +Pl+Ine+NoUml:%>ine           FINAL1    ;
!    +Pl+Ine+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1    ;
!         +Pl+Ela+NoUml:%>ijste         FINAL1    ;
!    +Pl+Ela+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLijste   FINAL1    ;
!         +Pl+Com+NoUml:ie%>jgujmie     FINAL1    ;
!   +Pl+Com+Uml+Err/Orth:%>%^iUMLigyjmie FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Com+NoUml+Err/Orth:ie%>jgyjmie     FINAL1   ;
!    +Pl+Com+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLigujmie FINAL1    ;
!            +Ess+NoUml:%>ine           FINAL1    ;
!       +Ess+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1    ;
!             +Cmp/SgNom:ie              R        ;
!       +Cmp/PlGen+NoUml:ie%>j           R        ;
!         +Cmp/PlGen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi       R        ;
!  +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%^aLATUS%»tj    N_ODD_PL  ;
!     +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj    N_ODD_ESS ;


!! ## Inflection for nouns ending in oe
!    ---------------------------------


!! The oe with umlaut generate the uml-ones
!! and have the non-uml ones as +Use/NG.

LEXICON N_OE_UML
    +Sg+Nom:oe FINAL1           ;
 +Sg+Use/NG:   N_OE_SGILL_UML   ; ! Causes Umlaut
        +Sg:   N_OE_SGILL_NOUML ; ! Does not cause Umlaut, 
               N_OE_NO_ILL      ; ! gives the other cases


LEXICON N_OE_SGILL_UML
N_OE_SGILL_UML_Px ;


       +Ill+Uml:e%>%^2UMLse    FINAL1 ; ! Causes Umlaut

LEXICON N_OE_SGILL_NOUML
 +Ill:o%>se FINAL1 ;


!! The oe without umlaut generate the non-uml-ones
!! only, naturally without +Use/NG.

LEXICON N_OE
 +Sg+Nom:oe FINAL1   ;
            N_OE_OBL ;

LEXICON N_OE_OBL
!! Lexicon @LEXNAME@ is for the -oe nouns without umlaut
!! Illative is lifted out in order to allow for Use/NG for the
!! umlauted ones.
 +Sg: N_OE_SGILL_NOUML ;
      N_OE_NO_ILL      ;

LEXICON N_OE_NO_ILL
               +Sg:            N_OE_SG  ;
               +Pl:            N_OE_PL  ;
                               N_OE_ESS ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:oe          R        ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:oe%>n       R        ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:oe%>j       R        ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»%^2UMLtj GÅATETJE ;
   +Der2+Der/Car+A:oht   hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;

LEXICON N_OE_SG
N_OE_SG_Px ;
                      +Acc:oe%>m           FINAL1 ;
              +Gen:oe%>n           FINAL1 ;
              +Ine:o%>sne          FINAL1 ;
              +Ela:o%>ste          FINAL1 ;
              +Com:o%>jne          FINAL1 ;

    
    
LEXICON N_OE_PL
         +Nom:oe%>h       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:o%>de        FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:oe%>j       FINAL1 ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:o%>j        FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:o%>de        FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:o%>jste     FINAL1 ;
         +Com:oe%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
+Com+Err/Orth:o%>jgujmie  FINAL1 ;
+Com+Err/Orth:oe%>jgyjmie FINAL1 ;

! La stå!!
!    +Nom+PxPl1:%>omh           FINAL1 ;
!    +Nom+PxPl2
!    +Nom+PxPl3:o%>bh           FINAL1 ;
!    
!    +Acc+PxPl1
!    +Acc+PxPl2
!    +Acc+PxPl3
!    
!    +Gen+PxPl1
!    +Gen+PxPl2
!    +Gen+PxPl3
!    
!    +Ill+PxPl1
!    +Ill+PxPl2
!    +Ill+PxPl3
!    
!    +Ela+PxPl1
!    +Ela+PxPl2
!    +Ela+PxPl3
!    
!    +Com+PxPl1
!    +Com+PxPl2
!    +Com+PxPl3:

LEXICON N_OE_ESS
 +Ess:o%>jne FINAL1 ;

! LEXICON LAAHKOE
!  +Der1+Der/Rec+N:oe LAAHKOEH_EVEN  ;
!              +Sg:   N_OE_SGILL_UML ; ! Causes Umlaut
!                       N_OE           ;
! 
! LEXICON GAAROEH ! -oe plural
!                     +Pl+Nom:oe%>h                  FINAL1    ;
!                     +Pl+Acc:o%>jde                 FINAL1    ;
!                     +Pl+Gen:oe%>j                  FINAL1    ;
!                     +Pl+Ill:o%>jde                 FINAL1    ;
!                     +Pl+Ine:o%>jne                 FINAL1    ;
!                     +Pl+Ela:o%>jste                FINAL1    ;
!                     +Pl+Com:oe%>jgujmie            FINAL1    ;
!             +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:oe%>jgyjmie            FINAL1    ;
!                        +Ess:o%>jne                 FINAL1    ;
!                   +Cmp/SgNom:oe                     R         ;
!                   +Cmp/PlGen:oe%>j                  R         ;
!        +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:e%»%^2UMLtj            N_ODD_PL  ;
!           +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»%^2UMLtj            N_ODD_ESS ;
!  +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:e%»%^2UMLtje           R         ;
!  +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:e%»%^2UMLtj%>%^DISIMPi R         ;
!  
!  
 


! Inflection for maana-type nouns
! -------------------------------
!LEXICON N_OE_MAANA
! +v1: N_OE  ;
! +v2: MAANA ;


LEXICON MAANA
 +Sg: MAANASGNOM ;
      MAANAOBL   ;


!LEXICON MAANA_SG
! +Sg: MAANASGNOM ;
! +Sg: MAANASGOBL ;

LEXICON MAANASGNOM
 +Nom:a FINAL1 ;

LEXICON MAANAOBL
               +Pl:             MAANA_PL   ;
                                EVEN_ESS   ;
               +Sg:             MAANASGOBL ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:a            R          ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:a%>n         R          ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:a%>j         R          ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj GÅATETJE   ;
 +Der2+Der/Car+A:eht   hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;
 
LEXICON MAANASGOBL
MAANASGOBL_Px ;
                      +Acc:a%>m      FINAL1 ;
              +Gen:a%>n      FINAL1 ;
              +Ill:e%>se     FINAL1 ;
              +Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
              +Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;
              +Com:%>ine     FINAL1 ;
        
